src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BETFAGE-DC
         +Sg+Nom:      K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:      RHyph ;
            +Ess:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j     K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:      K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:      RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v     K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n     K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s     K     ;
         +Pl+Nom:      K     ;
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Gen:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Pl+Acc:Q4jt  K     ;
         +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K     ;
         +Pl+Ine:Q4jn  K     ;
         +Pl+Ela:Q4js  K     ;
         +Pl+Com:Q4j   K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn  K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn  K     ; ! Norgejn
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j     K     ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j     K     ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jt    K     ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:jda   K     ;
 +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:jn    K     ;
 +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:js    K     ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:j     K     ;

LEXICON BETFAGE-DC-ORG
         +Sg+Nom:     K     ;
         +Sg+Nom:     RHyph ;
            +Ess:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ill:Q4j  K     ; !Q4 to get e:i
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:j    K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:     K     ;
         +Sg+Gen:     RHyph ;
         +Sg+Acc:v    K     ;
         +Sg+Ine:n    K     ;
         +Sg+Ela:s    K     ;
! +Pl+Nom: K ;
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Gen:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
! +Pl+Acc:Q4jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill:Q4jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine:Q4jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela:Q4js K ;
! +Pl+Com:Q4j K ; !Q4 to get e:i
         +Sg+Com:Q4jn K     ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:X5jn K     ; ! Norgejn
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j K ;
! +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:j K ;
! +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:jt K ;
! +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:jda K ;
! +Pl+Ine+Err/Orth:jn K ;
! +Pl+Ela+Err/Orth:js K ;
! +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:j K ;


!! Words in MARJA end on vowel, with CG, even-syllable case marking. Illative change e to á, illative i stays i. Last syllable is unstressed. Real lule sami stems.

LEXICON MARJA-fem !!= @CODE@ Odd-syllable with cg. Female names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                MARJADECL      ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:»                 DiminutiveEVEN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #              ;

!!€gt-norm: Gáddjá # Even-syllable test
!!€ Gáddjá:               Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Nom
!!€ Gáddjáj:              Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ill
!!€ Gádjás:               Gáddjá+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-I-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names ending on i. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-U-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names ending on u. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-A-fem !!= @CODE@ Female names ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

LEXICON MARJA-ani !!= @CODE@ Animal names
 +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> MARJADECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Vilge # Even-syllable test 
!!€ Gávrásski:               Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Nom
!!€ Gávrásskij:              Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ill
!!€ Gávráskis:              Gávrásski+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-A-ani !!= @CODE@ Animal names ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Ani:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-mal !!= @CODE@ Male names
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                MARJADECL      ;
                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:»                 DiminutiveEVEN ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #              ;

!!€gt-norm: Biet-Ánnda # Even-syllable test
!!€ Biet-Ánnda:               Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Nom
!!€ Biet-Ánndaj:              Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ill
!!€ Biet-Ándas:              Biet-Ánnda+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-I-mal !!= @CODE@ Male named ending on i. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-A-mal !!= @CODE@ Male named ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

!LEXICON MARJA-U-mal !!= @CODE@ Male named ending on u. Presently not used in SMJ.
!                            +N+Prop+Sem/Mal:%>                MARJADECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Sg+Attr@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Orth:%>0000@U.Cap.Obl@ #         ;

LEXICON MARJA-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects
 +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

!!€gt-norm: Bern-Konvensjåvnnå # Even-syllable test
!!€ Bern-Konvensjåvnnå:               Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Nom
!!€ Bern-Konvensjåvnnåj:              Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ill
!!€ Bern-Konvensjåvnås:               Bern-Konvensjåvnnå+N+Prop+Sem/Obj+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-A-obj !!= @CODE@ Objectes ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

!LEXICON MARJA-I-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects ending on i. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

!LEXICON MARJA-U-obj !!= @CODE@ Objects ending on u. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> MARJADECL ;

LEXICON MARJA-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations
 +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-ORG ;

!!€gt-norm: Domænadoajmma # Even-syllable test
!!€ Domænadoajmma:               Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom
! !!€ Domänadoajmma               Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Nom !no æ:ä for propers?
!!€ Domænadoajmmaj:              Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill
! !!€ Domänadoajmmaj              Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ill !no æ:ä for propers?
!!€ Domænadåjmas:              Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela
! !!€ Domänadåjmas              Domænadoajmma+N+Prop+Sem/Org+Sg+Ela !no æ:ä for propers?

!LEXICON MARJA-A-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations ending on a. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-ORG ;

!LEXICON MARJA-U-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations ending on u. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-ORG ;

!LEXICON MARJA-I-org !!= @CODE@ Organizations ending on i. Presently not used in SMJ.
! +N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> MARJADECL-ORG ;

LEXICON MARJA-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names)
        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>   MARJADECL-PLC ; ! Flags added in MARJADECL-PLC
 +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 MARJA-plc-der ;

!!€gt-norm: Dundarevuobme # Even-syllable test
!!€ Dundarevuobme:               Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom
!!€ Dundarevuobmáj:              Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ill
!!€ Dundarevuomes:              Dundarevuobme+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Ela

!LEXICON MARJA-A-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names). Presently not used in SMJ.
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>   MARJADECL-PLC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 MARJA-plc-der ;

!LEXICON MARJA-I-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names). Presently not used in SMJ.
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>   MARJADECL-PLC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 MARJA-plc-der ;

!LEXICON MARJA-U-plc !!= @CODE@ Vowel final names with Gradation and Ill change (place names). Presently not used in SMJ.
!        +N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>   MARJADECL-PLC ;
! +N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen:%>Q1 MARJA-plc-der ;
