src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ProperNoun
Aktidum% Nasjåvnnå:Aktidum% Nasjåvnnå MARJA-org ; !Multi
Alemusriektá:Alemus#riek0tá MARJA-org ;
Alliánssa+Use/Sub:Alli^anssa MARJA-org; !
Alliánssa:Alli^ánssa MARJA-org; !
Annda MARJA-mal ;
Anndi MARJA-mal ;
Arábiamerra:Arábia^merra MARJA-plc ;
Bengalluokta:Bengal^luokta MARJA-plc ;
Bern-konvensjåvnnå MARJA-obj ;
Bernkonvensjåvnnå:Bern^konvensjåvnnå MARJA-obj ;
Bieslåpptå:Bies^låpptå MARJA-plc ;
Biet-Ánnda MARJA-mal ;
Boannjá MARJA-mal ;
Bájsso MARJA-mal ;
Bállávrre:Báll^ávrre MARJA-plc ;
Básstevárre:Básste^várre MARJA-plc ;
Båsta-Nilssa MARJA-mal ;
Bæhttja:Bæhttja MARJA-mal ;
D-Norlánnda:D-Nor^lánnda MARJA-obj ;
Darrhavuobme:Darrha^vuobme MARJA-plc ;
Divtasvuodna:Divtas^vuodna MARJA-plc ;
Domænadoajmma:Domæ9na#doajmma MARJA-org ;
Dálmma MARJA-plc ;
E-Norlánnda:E-Nor^lánnda MARJA-obj ;
Eiffeltoarnna:Eiffel^toarnna MARJA-obj ;
eSkåvllå+Use/Sub:e^Skåvlla MARJA-org; !
eSkåvllå:e^Skåvllå MARJA-org; !
Europaráde:Europa#ráde MARJA-org ;
Finnmárkko:Finn^márkko MARJA-plc ;
Finnmárkokommisjåvnnå:Finn^márko#kommisjåvnnå MARJA-org ;
Finnmárkoláhka:Finn^márko^láhka MARJA-obj ;
Finnmárkoåbmudahka:Finn^márko^åbmudahka MARJA-obj ;
Fránssi MARJA-mal ;
Gasska-Nordlánnda:Gasska-Nord^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Gejrrá MARJA-mal ;
Gietsavuolle:Gietsa^vuolle MARJA-fem ;
Girttja MARJA-mal ;
Gotlánnda:Got^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Guovdásjbelludahka:Guovdásj#belludahka MARJA-org ;
Gutjávrre:Gut^jávrre MARJA-plc ;
Gáddjá MARJA-fem ;
Gåhpejávrre:Gåhpe^jávrre MARJA-plc ; !village
Gålmårijkamærkka:Gålmå^rijka^mærkka MARJA-obj ;
Gårobelludahka:Gåro^belludahka MARJA-org ;
Hellemoprosjækta:Hellemo^prosjækta MARJA-obj ;
Helmukvuodna:Helmuk^vuodna MARJA-plc ; !village
Hålogaládde:Håloga^ládde MARJA-plc ;
Hærrá:Hær'rá MARJA-mal ;
ILO-konvensjåvnnå MARJA-obj ;
Interregprosjækta:Interreg^prosjækta MARJA-obj ;
Iŋgá MARJA-fem ;
Iŋŋgá MARJA-fem ;
Jalltoáhpe:Jallto^áhpe MARJA-plc ;
Jietnjavárre:Jietnja^várre MARJA-plc ;
Justijssadepartemænnta:Justijssa#departemænnta MARJA-org ;
Justijssa-% ja% bulkkedepartemænnta MARJA-org ;
Jyllánnda:Jyl^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Jáhkki MARJA-mal ;
Keopspyramijdda:Ke^ops^pyramijdda MARJA-obj ;
Kájssa MARJA-fem ;
Kárásjjåhkå:Kárásj^jåhkå MARJA-plc ;
Laponiaprocessa:Laponia#processa  MARJA-org ;
Laponiahálla:Laponia^hál'la MARJA-obj ;
Lofotpoassta:Lofot^poassta MARJA-org ;
Luvddotjåhkkå:Luvddo^tjåhkkå  MARJA-plc ;
Lássi MARJA-mal ;
Mijá% Ájgge MARJA-obj ;
Mosambikatjoalmme:Mosambika^tjoalmme MARJA-plc ;
Mumistállu:Mumi^stállu MARJA-ani ;
Mumiáhčči:Mumi^áhčči MARJA-ani ;
Mágddá MARJA-fem ;
Máhttu MARJA-mal ;
Mánáj-% ja% dássádusdepartemænnta:Mánáj-% ja% dássádus#departemænnta MARJA-org ;
Mánáj-% ja% Åhpadussiebrreráde+CmpN/None:Mánáj-% ja% Åhpadus#siebrre#ráde MARJA-org; !
Máriddjá MARJA-fem ;
Márjjá MARJA-fem ;
Najkka MARJA-ani ;
Nilssa MARJA-mal ;
Nordlánnda:Nord^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Oalgesbelludahka:Oalges#belludahka MARJA-org ;
Ofoahtta MARJA-plc ;
Rudnávuodna:Rudná^vuodna MARJA-plc ; !village
Sallujávrre:Sallu^jávrre MARJA-plc ;
Sjællánnda:Sjæl^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Skåvllåpårttå:Skåvllå#pårttå  MARJA-org ;
Snuogge MARJA-ani ;
Snøhvitprosjækta:Snøhvit^prosjækta MARJA-obj ;
Stuor-Anndi MARJA-mal ;
Stuor-Ánndi MARJA-mal ;
Stuorgiedde:Stuor^giedde MARJA-plc ;
Stuorradigge:Stuorra#digge MARJA-org ;
Suomaluokta:Suoma^luokta MARJA-plc ;
Sámedigge:Sáme#digge MARJA-org ;
Sámefoanndå:Sáme^foanndå MARJA-org ;
Sámefånndå:Sáme^fånndå MARJA-org ;
Sámemisjåvnnå:Sáme^misjåvnnå MARJA-org ;
Sámeskåvllå:Sáme^skåvllå MARJA-org ;
Tanganjikajávrre:Tanganjika^jávrre MARJA-plc ;
Tjáhppa MARJA-ani ;
Tsirgga MARJA-ani ;
Tsåkávrre:Tsåk^ávrre MARJA-plc ;
Vuodnabahta:Vuodna^bahta MARJA-plc ;
Vuodoláhka:Vuodo^láhka MARJA-obj ;
Yukonædno:Yukon^ædno MARJA-plc ;
Ájtte MARJA-org ;
Álmmukbelludahka:Álmmuk#belludahka MARJA-org ;
Ánnda MARJA-mal ;
Ánndi MARJA-mal ;
Ánndu MARJA-mal ;
Ánni MARJA-fem ;
Ánnji MARJA-mal ;
Ássjo MARJA-org ;
Åhpadusdirekturáhtta:Åhpadus#direkturáhtta MARJA-org ;
Ålggorijkadepartemænnta+Use/Sub:Ålggo#rijka#departemennta MARJA-org; !
Ålggorijkadepartemænnta:Ålggo#rijka#departemænnta MARJA-org ;
Ölánnda:Ö^lánnda MARJA-plc ;
Š-nuorajmagasijnna:Š-nuoraj^magasijnna MARJA-obj ;
Šlurffe MARJA-ani ;
Guhkesluokta:Guhkes^luokta MARJA-plc ;
Jiellevárre:Jielle^várre MARJA-plc ;
Njunjesjávrre:Njunjes^jávrre MARJA-plc ;
Stáloluokta:Stálo^luokta MARJA-plc ; !village
Vastenjávrre:Vasten^jávrre MARJA-plc ;
Årjep% Sávllo MARJA-plc ;
Gárddegiehtje:Gárdde^giehtje MARJA-plc ;
Siejdevárre:Siejde^várre MARJA-plc ;
Tjieŋalluokta:Tjieŋal^luokta MARJA-plc ;
